test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kappeer_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - kappeer: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    kappeer+N+Sg+Nom: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Gen: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Acc: kappeer
    kappeer+N+Sg+Ill: kaperân
    kappeer+N+Sg+Loc: kaperist
    kappeer+N+Sg+Com: kaperáin
    kappeer+N+Sg+Abe: kappeerttáá
    kappeer+N+Ess: kaperin
    kappeer+N+Par: kaperid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Nom: kapereh
    kappeer+N+Pl+Gen: kaperij
    kappeer+N+Pl+Acc: kaperijd
    kappeer+N+Pl+Ill: kaperáid
    kappeer+N+Pl+Loc: kaperijn
    kappeer+N+Pl+Com: kaperijguin
    kappeer+N+Pl+Abe: kaperijttáá
